South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4783.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  (A) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 and each fiscal year thereafter through July 1, 2036, no justice of the Supreme Court, judge of the Court of Appeals, or judge of the Family Court may receive, from any state source, a salary supplement, expense allowance, office expense allocation, or other payment for official duties that exceeds the in-district compensation provided to members of the South Carolina General Assembly. (B) In addition to subsection (A), beginning July 1, 2026, and subject to Section 16, Article V of the South Carolina Constitution: (1) The base annual salary for any justice or judge of the Supreme Court, Court of Appeals, or Family Court elected and qualified on or after the effective date of this joint resolution must be established at an amount equal to the annual salary provided to members of the General Assembly. (2) For any justice or judge serving on the effective date of this joint resolution, the salary equalization required by item (1) applies only after the justice or judge completes his current term of office and is reelected to a subsequent term, if any. (3) The monthly office expense funding provided to any justice or judge may not exceed the monthly in-district compensation provided to members of the General Assembly. SECTION 2.  This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor and expires on July 1, 2036. ----XX----